Nebraska, session 109, LB937A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB937A LB937A
2026 2026
1 Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $106,400 from the
2 General Fund for FY2026-27 and (2) $109,592 from the General Fund for
3 FY2027-28 to the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska, for
4 Program 781, to aid in carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill
5 937, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, Second Session, 2026.
-2-